Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-117
Clerks; assistants of county officer; service in more than one office; when.

The clerks or assistants of any county officer may be required by the county board to serve or assist without additional pay in any other county office than that to which they were appointed, whenever the county board may deem it advisable and expedient for the efficient and economical administration of the affairs of the county.

Laws 1923, c. 37, § 1, p. 151;

C.S.1929, § 26-106;

R.S.1943, § 23-117;

Laws 1947, c. 62, § 1, p. 197;

Laws 1967, c. 118, § 1, p. 379.